Utah statutes.
11-42-405.   Limit on amount of assessment -- Costs required to be paid by
the local entity.
(1)  An assessment levied within an assessment area may not, in the aggregate,
exceed the sum of:
(a)  the contract price or estimated contract price;
(b)  the acquisition price of improvements;
(c)  the reasonable cost of:
(i) (A)  utility services, maintenance, and operation, to the extent permitted
by Subsection 11-42-401(4); and
(B)  labor, materials, or equipment supplied by the local entity;
(ii)  economic promotion activities; or
(iii)  operation and maintenance costs;
(d)  the price or estimated price of purchasing property;
(e)  any connection fees;
(f)  estimated interest on interim warrants and bond anticipation notes issued
with respect to an assessment area;
(g)  overhead costs not to exceed 15% of the sum of Subsections (1)(a), (b),
(c), and (e);
(h)  an amount for contingencies of not more than 10% of the sum of
Subsections (1)(a) and (c), if the assessment is levied before construction of
the improvements in the assessment area is completed;
(i)  an amount sufficient to fund a reserve fund, if the governing body
creates and funds a reserve fund as provided in Section 11-42-702; and
(j)  1/2 the cost of grading changes as provided in Section 11-42-407.
(2)  Each local entity providing an improvement in an assessment area shall
pay, from improvement revenues not pledged to the payment of bonds and from
any other legally available money:
(a)  overhead costs for which an assessment cannot be levied;
(b)  the costs of providing an improvement for which an assessment was not
levied, if the assessment is levied before construction of the improvement in
the assessment area is completed; and
(c)  the acquisition and constructions costs of an improvement for the benefit
of property against which an assessment may not be levied.
